Maine, session 132, LD405.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §1660, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Information on segregation. The report must include the following information
for county jails and regional jails about prisoners who have been segregated and not
allowed to leave their cells for a minimum of 22 hours out of a 24-hour period during the
prior calendar year:
A. The total number of prisoners who were segregated;
B. For each instance of segregation, the total amount of time a prisoner was segregated;
and
C. The reason why the prisoner was segregated.
As used in this subsection, "segregation" means the separation of a prisoner from the
general population of a county jail or regional jail for administrative or punitive reasons.
Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA §1660, as amended by PL 2015, c. 315, §3, is further amended
by enacting at the end a new paragraph to read:
After reviewing the report, the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over criminal justice matters is authorized to submit legislation to address
issues raised by the report.
Sec. 3. 34-A MRSA §1402, sub-§15 is enacted to read:
15. Report on segregated prisoners. On or before January 15, 2026 and annually
thereafter, the commissioner shall submit a report to the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over criminal justice matters that includes the following
information for each correctional facility about prisoners who have been segregated and
not allowed to leave their cells for a minimum of 22 hours out of a 24-hour period during
the prior calendar year:
A. The total number of prisoners who were segregated;
Page 1 - 132LR1006(04)

B. For each instance of segregation, the total amount of time a prisoner was segregated;
and
C. The reason why the prisoner was segregated.
After reviewing the report, the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over criminal justice matters is authorized to submit legislation to address
issues raised by the report.
Page 2 - 132LR1006(04)